Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2702YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 680 Section 1. Section 421.60, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The department shall furnish to the taxpayer, before 3 or at the time of issuing a notice of assessment or denial of 4 a refund claim, an a detailed explanation of the reasons for 5 the assessment or refund denial. An inadequate explanation 6 shall not invalidate the notice. For purposes of this section , 7 an explanation by the department shall be sufficient where 8 insufficient if only the amount of tax, interest, and penalty 9 is stated together with an attachment setting forth the 10 computation of the tax by the department. 11